Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-286
Transaction of business without registration; effect.

(a) A foreign limited partnership transacting business in this state may not maintain any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state until it has registered in this state.

(b) The failure of a foreign limited partnership to register in this state does not impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited partnership or the right of any other party to the contract to maintain any action, suit, or proceeding on the contract or prevent the foreign limited partnership from defending any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state.

(c) A limited partner of a foreign limited partnership is not liable as a general partner of the foreign limited partnership solely by reason of having transacted business in this state without registration.

(d) Transaction of business in this state without registration by a foreign limited partnership shall constitute sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over the partnership in any action arising out of its activity in this state.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 54;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 82;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 56.